Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6211
Health professional
group not previously regulated, defined.

Health
professional group not previously regulated shall mean those persons or groups
who are not currently licensed or otherwise regulated under the Uniform Credentialing
Act, who are determined by the director to be qualified by training, education,
or experience to perform the functions prescribed in this section, and whose
principal functions, customarily performed for remuneration, are to render
services directly or indirectly to individuals for the purpose of:

(1) Preventing physical, mental, or emotional injury or illness,
excluding persons acting in their capacity as clergy;

(2) Facilitating recovery from injury or illness;

(3) Providing rehabilitative or continuing care following
injury or illness; or

(4) Providing
any other health service, health-related service, or environmental service
which may be subject to regulation by the division.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 11;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1241;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 11.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.